Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Short Title, Construction, Application, and Subject Matter of Act.

Secs. 45.01.101 — 45.01.109.
Short title, construction, application, and subject matter of act. [Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 45.01.111.
Short titles.

AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code — General Provisions.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.112.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter applies to a transaction to the extent that the transaction is governed by another chapter of the code.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.113.
Construction of code to promote its purposes and policies; applicability of supplemental principles of law.

The code shall be liberally construed and applied to promote the code’s underlying purposes and policies, which are to

simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing commercial transactions;

permit the continued expansion of commercial practices through custom, usage, and agreement of the parties; and

make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of the code, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, and other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the code’s provisions.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.114.
Construction against implied repeal.

The code being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it may be considered to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.115.
Severability.

If a provision or clause of the code or application of the clause or provision to a person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the code that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of the code are severable.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.116.
Use of singular and plural; gender.

In the code, the rules of construction in AS

01.10.050(b)

and (c) apply, unless the statutory context otherwise requires.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.117.
Section captions.

Notwithstanding AS

01.05.006

and

01.05.031(b)(2)

, section captions are part of the code.

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.118.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The code modifies, limits, and supersedes 15 U.S.C. 7001 — 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act) but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of a notice described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

History.

(§ 8 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.